Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202018-2104
Exercise of powers; objective.

The governing body of a city, to the greatest extent it deems to be feasible in carrying out the provisions of the Community Development Law, shall afford maximum opportunity, consistent with the sound needs of the city as a whole, to the rehabilitation or redevelopment of the community redevelopment area by private enterprises. The governing body of a city shall give consideration to this objective in exercising its powers under the Community Development Law, including the formulation of a workable program, the approval of community redevelopment plans consistent with the general plan for the development of the city, the exercise of its zoning powers, the enforcement of other laws, codes, and regulations, relating to the use of land and the use and occupancy of buildings and improvements, the disposition of any property acquired, and the providing of necessary public improvements.

Laws 1951, c. 224, § 4(1), p. 800;

R.R.S.1943, § 14-1604;

Laws 1957, c. 52, § 5, p. 252;

Laws 1961, c. 61, § 4, p. 230;

R.R.S.1943, § 19-2604;

Laws 2018, LB874, § 8.